Utah statutes.
78B-6-1105.   Tobacco smoke -- Legislative intent.
(1)  The Legislature finds:
(a)  the federal Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) has determined that
environmental tobacco smoke is a Group A carcinogen, in the same category as
other cancer-causing chemicals such as asbestos;
(b)  the EPA has determined that there is no acceptable level of exposure to
Class A carcinogens; and
(c)  the EPA has determined that exposure to environmental tobacco smoke also
causes an increase in respiratory diseases and disorders among exposed
persons.
(2)  The Legislature finds that environmental tobacco smoke generated in a
rental or condominium unit may drift into other units, exposing the occupants
of those units to tobacco smoke, and that standard construction practices are
not effective in preventing this drift of tobacco smoke.
(3)  The Legislature further finds that persons who desire to not be exposed
to drifting environmental tobacco smoke should be able to determine in advance
of entering into a rental, lease, or purchase agreement whether the subject
unit may be exposed to environmental tobacco smoke.
